Illinois, session 104th, HB1929.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 5changing Sections 1-103 and 7-101 and by adding Section 7-114 6as follows: 7    (775 ILCS 5/1-103)  (from Ch. 68, par. 1-103)8    Sec. 1-103. General definitions. When used in this Act, 9unless the context requires otherwise, the term: 10    (A) Age. "Age" means the chronological age of a person who 11is at least 40 years old, except with regard to any practice 12described in Section 2-102, insofar as that practice concerns 13training or apprenticeship programs. In the case of training 14or apprenticeship programs, for the purposes of Section 2-102, 15"age" means the chronological age of a person who is 18 but not 16yet 40 years old. 17    (B) Aggrieved party. "Aggrieved party" means a person who 18is alleged or proved to have been injured by a civil rights 19violation or believes he or she will be injured by a civil 20rights violation under Article 3 that is about to occur. 21    (B-5) Arrest record. "Arrest record" means:22        (1) an arrest not leading to a conviction;23        (2) a juvenile record; or  HB1929- 2 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1        (3) criminal history record information ordered 2    expunged, sealed, or impounded under Section 5.2 of the 3    Criminal Identification Act. 4    (C) Charge. "Charge" means an allegation filed with the 5Department by an aggrieved party or initiated by the 6Department under its authority. 7    (D) Civil rights violation. "Civil rights violation" 8includes and shall be limited to only those specific acts set 9forth in Sections 2-102, 2-103, 2-105, 3-102, 3-102.1, 3-103, 103-102.10, 3-104.1, 3-105, 3-105.1, 4-102, 4-103, 5-102, 115A-102, 6-101, 6-101.5, and 6-102 of this Act. 12    (E) Commission. "Commission" means the Human Rights 13Commission created by this Act. 14    (F) Complaint. "Complaint" means the formal pleading filed 15by the Department with the Commission following an 16investigation and finding of substantial evidence of a civil 17rights violation. 18    (G) Complainant. "Complainant" means a person including 19the Department who files a charge of civil rights violation 20with the Department or the Commission. 21    (G-5) Conviction record. "Conviction record" means 22information indicating that a person has been convicted of a 23felony, misdemeanor or other criminal offense, placed on 24probation, fined, imprisoned, or paroled pursuant to any law 25enforcement or military authority.26    (H) Department. "Department" means the Department of Human   HB1929- 3 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1Rights created by this Act. 2    (I) Disability. 3    (1) "Disability" means a determinable physical or mental 4characteristic of a person, including, but not limited to, a 5determinable physical characteristic which necessitates the 6person's use of a guide, hearing or support dog, the history of 7such characteristic, or the perception of such characteristic 8by the person complained against, which may result from 9disease, injury, congenital condition of birth or functional 10disorder and which characteristic: 11        (a) For purposes of Article 2, is unrelated to the 12    person's ability to perform the duties of a particular job 13    or position and, pursuant to Section 2-104 of this Act, a 14    person's illegal use of drugs or alcohol is not a 15    disability; 16        (b) For purposes of Article 3, is unrelated to the 17    person's ability to acquire, rent, or maintain a housing 18    accommodation; 19        (c) For purposes of Article 4, is unrelated to a 20    person's ability to repay; 21        (d) For purposes of Article 5, is unrelated to a 22    person's ability to utilize and benefit from a place of 23    public accommodation; 24        (e) For purposes of Article 5, also includes any 25    mental, psychological, or developmental disability, 26    including autism spectrum disorders.   HB1929- 4 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1    (2) Discrimination based on disability includes unlawful 2discrimination against an individual because of the 3individual's association with a person with a disability. 4    (I-5) Formerly convicted person. "Formerly convicted 5person" means a person:6        (1) who has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor 7    under the laws of this State, an ordinance of a unit of 8    local government of this State, another state, territory, 9    or possession of the United States, federal law, or the 10    laws of another country that guarantees due process rights 11    similar to those of the United States; and12        (2) who has completed the person's parole, mandatory 13    supervised release term, term of probation, or conditional 14    discharge. 15    (J) Marital status. "Marital status" means the legal 16status of being married, single, separated, divorced, or 17widowed. 18    (J-1) Military status. "Military status" means a person's 19status on active duty in or status as a veteran of the armed 20forces of the United States, status as a current member or 21veteran of any reserve component of the armed forces of the 22United States, including the United States Army Reserve, 23United States Marine Corps Reserve, United States Navy 24Reserve, United States Air Force Reserve, and United States 25Coast Guard Reserve, or status as a current member or veteran 26of the Illinois Army National Guard or Illinois Air National   HB1929- 5 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1Guard. 2    (K) National origin. "National origin" means the place in 3which a person or one of his or her ancestors was born. 4    (K-5) "Order of protection status" means a person's status 5as being a person protected under an order of protection 6issued pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, 7Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, the 8Stalking No Contact Order Act, or the Civil No Contact Order 9Act, or an order of protection issued by a court of another 10state. 11    (L) Person. "Person" includes one or more individuals, 12partnerships, associations or organizations, labor 13organizations, labor unions, joint apprenticeship committees, 14or union labor associations, corporations, the State of 15Illinois and its instrumentalities, political subdivisions, 16units of local government, legal representatives, trustees in 17bankruptcy or receivers. 18    (L-5) Pregnancy. "Pregnancy" means pregnancy, childbirth, 19or medical or common conditions related to pregnancy or 20childbirth. 21    (M) Public contract. "Public contract" includes every 22contract to which the State, any of its political 23subdivisions, or any municipal corporation is a party. 24    (M-5) Race. "Race" includes traits associated with race, 25including, but not limited to, hair texture and protective 26hairstyles such as braids, locks, and twists.   HB1929- 6 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1    (N) Religion. "Religion" includes all aspects of religious 2observance and practice, as well as belief, except that with 3respect to employers, for the purposes of Article 2, 4"religion" has the meaning ascribed to it in paragraph (F) of 5Section 2-101. 6    (O) Sex. "Sex" means the status of being male or female. 7    (O-1) Sexual orientation. "Sexual orientation" means 8actual or perceived heterosexuality, homosexuality, 9bisexuality, or gender-related identity, whether or not 10traditionally associated with the person's designated sex at 11birth. "Sexual orientation" does not include a physical or 12sexual attraction to a minor by an adult. 13    (O-2) Reproductive Health Decisions. "Reproductive Health 14Decisions" means a person's decisions regarding the person's 15use of: contraception; fertility or sterilization care; 16assisted reproductive technologies; miscarriage management 17care; healthcare related to the continuation or termination of 18pregnancy; or prenatal, intranatal, or postnatal care. 19    (O-5) Source of income. "Source of income" means the 20lawful manner by which an individual supports himself or 21herself and his or her dependents. 22    (P) Unfavorable military discharge. "Unfavorable military 23discharge" includes discharges from the Armed Forces of the 24United States, their Reserve components, or any National Guard 25or Naval Militia which are classified as RE-3 or the 26equivalent thereof, but does not include those characterized   HB1929- 7 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1as RE-4 or "Dishonorable". 2    (Q) Unlawful discrimination. "Unlawful discrimination" 3means discrimination against a person because of his or her: 4        (1) actual or perceived: race, color, religion, 5    national origin, ancestry, age, sex, marital status, order 6    of protection status, disability, military status, sexual 7    orientation, pregnancy, reproductive health decisions, or 8    unfavorable discharge from military service as those terms 9    are defined in this Section; or10        (2) status as a formerly convicted person if the 11    person has been granted protective class status by the 12    Department as provided in Section 7-114. 13(Source: P.A. 102-362, eff. 1-1-22; 102-419, eff. 1-1-22; 14102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-896, eff. 151-1-23; 102-1102, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-785, 16eff. 1-1-25.) 17    (775 ILCS 5/7-101)  (from Ch. 68, par. 7-101)18    Sec. 7-101. Powers and duties. In addition to other powers 19and duties prescribed in this Act, the Department shall have 20the following powers:21    (A) Rules and Regulations. To adopt, promulgate, amend, 22and rescind rules and regulations not inconsistent with the 23provisions of this Act pursuant to the Illinois Administrative 24Procedure Act.25    (B) Charges. To issue, receive, investigate, conciliate,   HB1929- 8 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1settle, and dismiss charges filed in conformity with this Act.2    (C) Compulsory Process. To request subpoenas as it deems 3necessary for its investigations.4    (D) Complaints. To file complaints with the Commission in 5conformity with this Act and to intervene in complaints 6pending before the Commission filed under Article 2, 4, 5, 5A, 7or 6.8    (E) Judicial Enforcement. To seek temporary relief and to 9enforce orders of the Commission in conformity with this Act.10    (F) Equal Employment Opportunities. To take such action as 11may be authorized to provide for equal employment 12opportunities and affirmative action.13    (G) Recruitment; Research; Public Communication; Advisory 14Councils. To engage in such recruitment, research and public 15communication and create such advisory councils as may be 16authorized to effectuate the purposes of this Act.17    (H) Coordination with other Agencies. To coordinate its 18activities with federal, state, and local agencies in 19conformity with this Act.20    (I) Grants; Private Gifts.21        (1) To accept public grants and private gifts as may 22    be authorized.23        (2) To design grant programs and award grants to 24    eligible recipients. 25    (J) Education and Training. To implement a formal and 26unbiased program of education and training for all employees   HB1929- 9 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1assigned to investigate and conciliate charges under Articles 27A and 7B. The training program shall include the following:3        (1) substantive and procedural aspects of the 4    investigation and conciliation positions;5        (2) current issues in human rights law and practice;6        (3) lectures by specialists in substantive areas 7    related to human rights matters;8        (4) orientation to each operational unit of the 9    Department and Commission;10        (5) observation of experienced Department 11    investigators and attorneys conducting conciliation 12    conferences, combined with the opportunity to discuss 13    evidence presented and rulings made;14        (6) the use of hypothetical cases requiring the 15    Department investigator and conciliation conference 16    attorney to issue judgments as a means to evaluating 17    knowledge and writing ability;18        (7) writing skills;19        (8) computer skills, including but not limited to word 20    processing and document management.21    A formal, unbiased and ongoing professional development 22program including, but not limited to, the above-noted areas 23shall be implemented to keep Department investigators and 24attorneys informed of recent developments and issues and to 25assist them in maintaining and enhancing their professional 26competence.  HB1929- 10 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1    (K) Hotlines. To establish and maintain hotlines and 2helplines to aid in effectuating the purposes of this Act 3including the confidential reporting of discrimination, 4harassment, and bias incidents. All communications received or 5sent via the hotlines and helplines are exempt from disclosure 6under the Freedom of Information Act. 7    (L) Protected Class Status. To grant protective class 8status to formerly convicted persons as provided in Section 97-114. 10(Source: P.A. 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-335, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-859, eff. 1-1-25.) 12    (775 ILCS 5/7-114 new)13    Sec. 7-114. Protected class status for formerly convicted 14persons.15    (A) A formerly convicted person may petition the 16Department for a grant of protected class status as provided 17in this Section. The Department may grant protected class 18status to a formerly convicted person who meets the following 19conditions:20        (1) the person has complied with each term and 21    condition of the person's parole, mandatory supervised 22    release, probation, or conditional discharge;23        (2) if the person has not obtained a high school 24    diploma or received a high school equivalency certificate 25    and has not been diagnosed as a person having an   HB1929- 11 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1    intellectual or developmental disability that prevents the 2    person from successfully passing the high school 3    equivalency test, the person must have passed the high 4    school equivalency test and been issued a high school 5    equivalency certificate under Section 3-15.12 of the 6    School Code;7        (3) the person must:8            (a) be employed or actively seeking employment 9        unless the person has been diagnosed as a person 10        having an intellectual or developmental disability 11        that prevents the person from being employed; or12            (b) be enrolled in or have successfully completed 13        a vocational training or college educational program 14        unless the person has been diagnosed as a person 15        having an intellectual or developmental disability 16        that prevents the person from successfully completing 17        a vocational or college educational program;18        (4) the person must, for a minimum of 5 years after 19    completion of the person's parole, mandatory supervised 20    release, probation, or conditional discharge, not have 21    been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor under the laws 22    of this State or a municipal or county ordinance of a 23    county or municipality of this State, another state, 24    territory, or possession of the United States, federal 25    law, or the laws of another country that guarantees due 26    process rights similar to those of the United States; and  HB1929- 12 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1        (5) must have completed all sanctions imposed upon the 2    person through due process of law for the person's 3    conviction.4    (B) The Department shall determine by rule:5        (1) what constitutes having an intellectual or 6    developmental disability that prevents the formerly 7    convicted person from meeting the requirements of 8    paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (A); and9        (2) who is qualified to diagnose such a person.10    (C) The Department shall adopt rules, subject to the 11Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to carry out the 12provisions of this Section.13    (D) Protected class status previously granted to a 14formerly convicted person under this Section shall be revoked 15by the Department after notice and a hearing, if the formerly 16convicted person is subsequently convicted of a felony or 17misdemeanor, other than a minor traffic offense, under the 18laws of this State, another state, territory, or possession of 19the United States, federal law, or the laws of another country 20that guarantees due process rights similar to those of the 21United States. The revocation process shall be initiated by a 22petition filed by a State's Attorney, the Attorney General, 23other prosecutor, or the Department, that sets forth the date 24of the subsequent offense, description of the offense, date of 25conviction for the subsequent offense, and sentence imposed 26for the conviction. A copy of the petition and notice of the   HB1929- 13 -LRB104 09254 JRC 19312 b1hearing date on the petition shall be served on the formerly 2convicted person.